New Jersey, session 221, A4226.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489c) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in sections 3 through 18 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489c et al.): "Applicant" means a developer proposing to enter into a redevelopment incentive grant agreement. "Ancillary infrastructure project" means structures or improvements that are located within the incentive area but outside the project area of a redevelopment project, including, but not limited to, docks, bulkheads, parking garages, public electric vehicle charging stations, freight rail spurs, roadway overpasses, and train station platforms, provided a developer or municipal redeveloper has demonstrated that the redevelopment project would not be economically viable or promote the use of public transportation without such improvements, as approved by the State Treasurer. "Authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established under section 4 of P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-4). "Aviation district" means all areas within the boundaries of the "Atlantic City International Airport," established pursuant to section 24 of P.L.1991, c.252 (C.27:25A-24), and the Federal Aviation Administration William J. Hughes Technical Center and the area within a one-mile radius of the outermost boundary of the "Atlantic City International Airport" and the Federal Aviation Administration William J. Hughes Technical Center. "Deep poverty pocket" means a population census tract having a poverty level of 20 percent or more, and which is located within the incentive area and has been determined by the authority to be an area appropriate for development and in need of economic development incentive assistance. "Developer" means any person who enters or proposes to enter into a redevelopment incentive grant agreement pursuant to the provisions of section 9 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489i), or its successors or assignees, including but not limited to a lender that completes a redevelopment project, operates a redevelopment project, or completes and operates a redevelopment project.  A developer also may be a municipal redeveloper as defined herein or Rutgers, the State University of New Jersey. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Disaster recovery project" means a redevelopment project located on property that has been wholly or substantially damaged or destroyed as a result of a federally-declared disaster, and which is located within the incentive area and has been determined by the authority to be in an area appropriate for development and in need of economic development incentive assistance. "Distressed municipality" means a municipality that is qualified to receive assistance under P.L.1978, c.14 (C.52:27D-178 et seq.), a municipality under the supervision of the Local Finance Board pursuant to the provisions of the "Local Government Supervision Act (1947)," P.L.1947, c.151 (C.52:27BB-1 et seq.), a municipality identified by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs to be facing serious fiscal distress, a SDA municipality, or a municipality in which a major rail station is located. "Electric vehicle charging station" means an electric component assembly or cluster of component assemblies designed specifically to charge batteries within electric vehicles by permitting the transfer of electric energy to a battery or other storage device in an electric vehicle. "Eligibility period" means the period of time specified in a redevelopment incentive grant agreement for the payment of reimbursements to a developer, which period shall not exceed 20 years, with the term to be determined solely at the discretion of the applicant. "Eligible revenue" means the property tax increment and any other incremental revenues set forth in section 11 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489k), except in the case of a Garden State Growth Zone, in which the property tax increment and any other incremental revenues are calculated as those incremental revenues that would have existed notwithstanding the provisions of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.). "Garden State Growth Zone" or "growth zone" means the four New Jersey cities with the lowest median family income based on the 2009 American Community Survey from the US Census, (Table 708.  Household, Family, and Per Capita Income and Individuals, and Families Below Poverty Level by City: 2009); a municipality which contains a Tourism District as established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2011, c.18 (C.5:12-219) and regulated by the Casino Reinvestment Development Authority; or an aviation district. "Highlands development credit receiving area or redevelopment area" means an area located within an incentive area and designated by the Highlands Council for the receipt of Highlands Development Credits under the Highlands Transfer Development Rights Program authorized under section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13). "Incentive grant" means reimbursement of all or a portion of the project financing gap of a redevelopment project through the State or a local Economic Redevelopment and Growth Grant program pursuant to section 4 or section 5 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489d or C.52:27D-489e). "Infrastructure improvements in the public right-of-way" mean public structures or improvements, including public electric vehicle charging stations, located in the public right-of-way that are located within a project area or that constitute an ancillary infrastructure project, either of which are dedicated to or owned by a governmental body or agency upon completion, or any required payment in lieu of the structures, improvements or projects, or any costs of remediation associated with the structures, improvements or projects, and that are determined by the authority, in consultation with applicable State agencies, to be consistent with and in furtherance of State public infrastructure objectives and initiatives. "Low-income housing" means housing affordable according to federal Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to 50 percent or less of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "Major rail station" means a railroad station located within a qualified incentive area which provides access to the public to a minimum of six rail passenger service lines operated by the New Jersey Transit Corporation. "Mixed use parking project" means a redevelopment project, the parking component of which shall constitute 51 percent or more of any of the following: a.     the total square footage of the entire mixed use parking project; b.    the estimated revenues of the entire mixed use parking project; or c.     the total construction cost of the entire mixed use parking project. "Moderate-income housing" means housing affordable, according to United States Department of Housing and Urban Development or other recognized standards for home ownership and rental costs, and occupied or reserved for occupancy by households with a gross household income equal to more than 50 percent but less than 80 percent of the median gross household income for households of the same size within the housing region in which the housing is located. "Municipal redeveloper" means an applicant for a redevelopment incentive grant agreement, which applicant is: a.     a municipal government, a municipal parking authority, or a redevelopment agency acting on behalf of a municipal government as defined in section 3 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-3); or b.    a developer of a mixed use parking project, provided that the parking component of the mixed use parking project is operated and maintained by a municipal parking authority for the term of any financial assistance granted pursuant to P.L.2015, c.69. "Municipal Revitalization Index" means the 2007 index by the Office of Planning Advocacy within the Department of State measuring or ranking municipal distress. "Non-parking component" means that portion of a mixed use parking project not used for parking, together with the portion of the costs of the mixed use parking project, including but not limited to the footings, foundations, site work, infrastructure, and soft costs that are allocable to the non-parking use. "Parking component" means that portion of a mixed use parking project used for parking, together with the portion of the costs of the mixed use parking project, including but not limited to the footings, foundations, site work, infrastructure, and soft costs that are allocable to the parking use.  The parking component, which may include enclosed pedestrian walkways or a skybridge, may be in the same structure as all the non-parking components or may be in a structure with some non-parking components with the remaining non-parking components in an adjacent or nearby structure that is no more than one third of a mile from the parking components. "Project area" means land or lands located within the incentive area under common ownership or control including through a redevelopment agreement with a municipality, or as otherwise established by a municipality or a redevelopment agreement executed by a State entity to implement a redevelopment project. "Project cost" means the costs incurred in connection with the redevelopment project by the developer until the issuance of a permanent certificate of occupancy, or until such other time specified by the authority, for a specific investment or improvement, including the costs relating to: receiving Highlands Development Credits under the Highlands Transfer Development Rights Program authorized pursuant to section 13 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-13), lands, buildings, improvements, real or personal property, or any interest therein, including leases discounted to present value, including lands under water, riparian rights, space rights and air rights acquired, owned, developed or redeveloped, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated or improved, and any environmental remediation costs[, plus costs not directly related to construction, of an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the total costs], capitalized interest paid to third parties, which for purposes of this definition shall be deemed to be costs directly related to construction, the funding of a debt service reserve fund, [and] the cost of infrastructure improvements, including ancillary infrastructure projects, and an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the total project cost for costs not directly related to construction, and, for projects located in a Garden State Growth Zone only, the cost of infrastructure improvements, including any ancillary infrastructure project and the amount by which total project cost exceeds the cost of an alternative location for the redevelopment project, but excluding any particular costs for which the project has received federal, State, or local funding.  In the case of a mixed use parking project that is undertaken by a municipal redeveloper and that did not commence construction before the declaration of the COVID-19 public health emergency on March 9, 2020, project costs may include, in the discretion of the chief executive officer of the authority consistent with applicable law, the cost or value of land, demolition, and equity contributions, as well as any particular costs for which the project has received State or local funding. "Project financing gap" means: a.     the part of the total project cost, including return on investment, that remains to be financed after all other sources of capital have been accounted for, including, but not limited to, developer-contributed capital, which shall not be less than 20 percent of the total project cost, which may include the value of any existing land and improvements in the project area owned or controlled by the developer, and the cost of infrastructure improvements in the public right-of-way, subject to review by the State Treasurer, and investor or financial entity capital or loans for which the developer, after making all good faith efforts to raise additional capital, certifies that additional capital cannot be raised from other sources on a non-recourse basis; and b.    the amount by which total project cost exceeds the cost of an alternative location for the out-of-State redevelopment project. "Project revenue" means all rents, fees, sales, and payments generated by a project, less taxes or other government payments. "Property tax increment" means the amount obtained by: a.     multiplying the general tax rate levied each year by the taxable value of all the property assessed within a project area in the same year, excluding any special assessments; and b.    multiplying that product by a fraction having a numerator equal to the taxable value of all the property assessed within the project area, minus the property tax increment base, and having a denominator equal to the taxable value of all property assessed within the project area. For the purpose of this definition, "property tax increment base" means the aggregate taxable value of all property assessed which is located within the redevelopment project area as of October 1st of the year preceding the year in which the redevelopment incentive grant agreement is authorized. "Public electric vehicle charging station" means an electric vehicle charging station located at a publicly available parking space. "Public hydrogen fueling station" means publicly available equipment to store and dispense hydrogen fuel to vehicles according to industry codes and standards. "Publicly available parking space" means a parking space that is available to, and accessible by, the public and may include on-street parking spaces and parking spaces in surface lots or parking garages, but shall not include: a parking space that is part of, or associated with, a private residence; or a parking space that is reserved for the exclusive use of an individual driver or vehicle or for a group of drivers or vehicles, such as employees, tenants, visitors, residents of a common interest development, or residents of an adjacent building. "Qualified incubator facility" means a commercial building located within an incentive area: which contains 100,000 or more square feet of office, laboratory, or industrial space; which is located near, and presents opportunities for collaboration with, a research institution, teaching hospital, college, or university; and within which, at least 75 percent of the gross leasable area is restricted for use by one or more technology startup companies during the commitment period. "Qualified residential project" means a redevelopment project that is predominantly residential and includes multi-family residential units for purchase or lease, or dormitory units for purchase or lease, having a total project cost of at least $17,500,000, if the project is located in any municipality with a population greater than 200,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, or having a total project cost of at least $10,000,000 if the project is located in any municipality with a population less than 200,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, or is a disaster recovery project, or having a total project cost of $5,000,000 if the project is in a Garden State Growth Zone. "Qualifying economic redevelopment and growth grant incentive area" or "incentive area" means: a.     an aviation district; b.    a port district; c.     a distressed municipality; or d.    an area (1) designated pursuant to the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et seq.), as: (a)  Planning Area 1 (Metropolitan); (b)  Planning Area 2 (Suburban); or (c)  Planning Area 3 (Fringe Planning Area); (2)  located within a smart growth area and planning area designated in a master plan adopted by the New Jersey Meadowlands Commission pursuant to subsection (i) of section 6 of P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-6) or subject to a redevelopment plan adopted by the New Jersey Meadowlands Commission pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-21); (3)  located within any land owned by the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority, established pursuant to P.L.1971, c.137 (C.5:10-1 et seq.), within the boundaries of the Hackensack Meadowlands District as delineated in section 4 of P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-4); (4)  located within a regional growth area, rural development area zoned for industrial use as of the effective date of P.L.2016, c.75, town, village, or a military and federal installation area designated in the comprehensive management plan prepared and adopted by the Pinelands Commission pursuant to the "Pinelands Protection Act," P.L.1979, c.111 (C.13:18A-1 et seq.); (5)  located within the planning area of the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3) or in a highlands development credit receiving area or redevelopment area; (6)  located within a Garden State Growth Zone; (7)  located within land approved for closure under any federal Base Closure and Realignment Commission action; or (8)  located only within the following portions of the areas designated pursuant to the "State Planning Act," P.L.1985, c.398 (C.52:18A-196 et al.), as Planning Area 4A (Rural Planning Area), Planning Area 4B (Rural/Environmentally Sensitive) or Planning Area 5 (Environmentally Sensitive) if Planning Area 4A (Rural Planning Area), Planning Area 4B (Rural/Environmentally Sensitive) or Planning Area 5 (Environmentally Sensitive) is located within: (a)  a designated center under the State Development and Redevelopment Plan; (b)  a designated growth center in an endorsed plan until the State Planning Commission revises and readopts New Jersey's State Strategic Plan and adopts regulations to revise this definition as it pertains to Statewide planning areas; (c)  any area determined to be in need of redevelopment pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-5 and C.40A:12A-6) or in need of rehabilitation pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-14); (d)  any area on which a structure exists or previously existed including any desired expansion of the footprint of the existing or previously existing structure provided the expansion otherwise complies with all applicable federal, State, county, and local permits and approvals; (e)  the planning area of the Highlands Region as defined in section 3 of P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-3) or a highlands development credit receiving area or redevelopment area; or (f)  any area on which an existing tourism destination project is located. "Qualifying economic redevelopment and growth grant incentive area" or "incentive area" shall not include any property located within the preservation area of the Highlands Region as defined in the "Highlands Water Protection and Planning Act," P.L.2004, c.120 (C.13:20-1 et al.). "Redevelopment incentive grant agreement" means an agreement between: a.     the State and the New Jersey Economic Development Authority and a developer; or b.    a municipality and a developer, or a municipal ordinance authorizing a project to be undertaken by a municipal redeveloper, under which, in exchange for the proceeds of an incentive grant, the developer agrees to perform any work or undertaking necessary for a redevelopment project, including the clearance, development or redevelopment, construction, or rehabilitation of any structure or improvement of commercial, industrial, residential, or public structures or improvements within a qualifying economic redevelopment and growth grant incentive area or a transit village. "Redevelopment project" means a specific construction project or improvement, including lands, buildings, improvements, real and personal property or any interest therein, including lands under water, riparian rights, space rights and air rights, acquired, owned, leased, developed or redeveloped, constructed, reconstructed, rehabilitated or improved, undertaken by a developer, owner or tenant, or both, within a project area and any ancillary infrastructure project including infrastructure improvements in the public right-of-way, as set forth in an application to be made to the authority.  The use of the term "redevelopment project" in sections 3 through 18 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489c et al.) shall not be limited to only redevelopment projects located in areas determined to be in need of redevelopment pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-5 and C.40A:12A-6) but shall also include, but not be limited to, any work or undertaking in accordance with the "Redevelopment Area Bond Financing Law," sections 1 through 10 of P.L.2001, c.310 (C.40A:12A-64 et seq.) or other applicable law, pursuant to a redevelopment plan adopted by a State entity, or as described in the resolution adopted by a public entity created by State law with the power to adopt a redevelopment plan or otherwise determine the location, type and character of a redevelopment project or part of a redevelopment project on land owned or controlled by it or within its jurisdiction, including but not limited to, the New Jersey Meadowlands Commission established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.404 (C.13:17-1 et seq.), the New Jersey Sports and Exposition Authority established pursuant to P.L.1971 c.137 (C.5:10-1 et seq.) and the Fort Monmouth Economic Revitalization Authority created pursuant to P.L.2010, c.51 (C.52:27I-18 et seq.).  A redevelopment project may include the development of zero-emission vehicle fueling and charging infrastructure. "Redevelopment utility" means a self-liquidating fund created by a municipality pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489l) to account for revenues collected and incentive grants paid pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489k), or other revenues dedicated to a redevelopment project. "Revenue increment base" means the amounts of all eligible revenues from sources within the redevelopment project area in the calendar year proceeding the year in which the redevelopment incentive grant agreement is executed, as certified by the State Treasurer for State revenues, and the chief financial officer of the municipality for municipal revenues. "SDA district" means an SDA district as defined in section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3). "SDA municipality" means a municipality in which an SDA district is situated. "Technology startup company" means a for profit business that has been in operation fewer than five years and is developing or possesses a proprietary technology or business method of a high-technology or life science-related product, process, or service which the business intends to move to commercialization. "Tourism destination project" means a redevelopment project that will be among the most visited privately owned or operated tourism or recreation sites in the State, and which is located within the incentive area and has been determined by the authority to be in an area appropriate for development and in need of economic development incentive assistance. "Transit project" means a redevelopment project located within a 1/2-mile radius, or one-mile radius for projects located in a Garden State Growth Zone, surrounding the mid-point of a New Jersey Transit Corporation, Port Authority Transit Corporation, or Port Authority Trans-Hudson Corporation rail, bus, or ferry station platform area, including all light rail stations. "Transit village" means a community with a bus, train, light rail, or ferry station that has developed a plan to achieve its economic development and revitalization goals and has been designated by the New Jersey Department of Transportation as a transit village. "University infrastructure" means any of the following located on the campus of Rutgers, the State University of New Jersey: a.     buildings and structures, such as academic buildings, recreation centers, indoor athletic facilities, public works garages, and water and sewer treatment and pumping facilities; b.    open space with improvements, such as athletic fields and other outdoor athletic facilities, planned commons, and parks; and c.     transportation facilities, such as bus shelters and parking facilities. "Urban transit hub" means an urban transit hub, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208), that is located within an eligible municipality, as defined in section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208), or all light rail stations and property located within a one-mile radius of the mid-point of the platform area of such a rail, bus, or ferry station if the property is in a qualified municipality under the "Municipal Rehabilitation and Economic Recovery Act," P.L.2002, c.43 (C.52:27BBB-1 et al.). "Vacant commercial building" means any commercial building or complex of commercial buildings having over 400,000 square feet of office, laboratory, or industrial space that is more than 70 percent unoccupied at the time of application to the authority or is negatively impacted by the approval of a "qualified business facility," as defined pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2007, c.346 (C.34:1B-208), or any vacant commercial building in a Garden State Growth Zone having over 35,000 square feet of office, laboratory, or industrial space, or over 200,000 square feet of office, laboratory, or industrial space in Atlantic, Burlington, Camden, Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester, Ocean, or Salem counties available for occupancy for a period of over one year. "Vacant health facility project" means a redevelopment project where a health facility, as defined by section 2 of P.L.1971, c.136 (C.26:2H-2), currently exists and is considered vacant.  A health facility shall be considered vacant if at least 70 percent of that facility has not been open to the public or utilized to serve any patients at the time of application to the authority. "Zero-emission vehicle" means a vehicle certified as a zero emission vehicle pursuant to the California Air Resources Board zero emission vehicle standards for the applicable model year, including but not limited to, battery electric-powered vehicles and hydrogen fuel cell vehicles. "Zero-emission vehicle fueling and charging infrastructure" means infrastructure to charge or fuel zero-emission vehicles, including but not limited to, public electric vehicle charging stations and public hydrogen fueling stations. (cf: P.L.2022, c.75, s.1) 2.    Section 6 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489f) is amended to read as follows: 6.    a. Up to the limits established in subsection b. of this section and in accordance with a redevelopment incentive grant agreement, beginning upon the receipt of occupancy permits for any portion of the redevelopment project, or upon any other event evidencing project completion as set forth in the incentive grant agreement, the State Treasurer shall pay to the developer incremental State revenues directly realized from businesses operating at the site of the redevelopment project from the following taxes: the Corporation Business Tax Act (1945), P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-1 et seq.), the tax imposed on marine insurance companies pursuant to R.S.54:16-1 et seq., the tax imposed on insurers generally, pursuant to P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-1 et seq.), the public utility franchise tax, public utilities gross receipts tax and public utility excise tax imposed on sewerage and water corporations pursuant to P.L.1940, c.5 (C.54:30A-49 et seq.), those tariffs and charges imposed by electric, natural gas, telecommunications, water and sewage utilities, and cable television companies under the jurisdiction of the New Jersey Board of Public Utilities, or comparable entity, except for those tariffs, fees, or taxes related to societal benefits charges assessed pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1999, c.23 (C.48:3-60), any charges paid for compliance with the "Global Warming Response Act," P.L.2007, c.112 (C.26:2C-37 et seq.), transitional energy facility assessment unit taxes paid pursuant to section 67 of P.L.1997, c.162 (C.48:2-21.34), and the sales and use taxes on public utility and cable television services and commodities, the tax derived from net profits from business, a distributive share of partnership income, or a pro rata share of S corporation income under the "New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act," N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., the tax derived from a business at the site of a redevelopment project that is required to collect the tax pursuant to the "Sales and Use Tax Act," P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.), the tax imposed pursuant to P.L.1966, c.30 (C.54:32B-1 et seq.) from the purchase of furniture, fixtures and equipment, or materials for the remediation, the construction of new structures at the site of a redevelopment project, the hotel and motel occupancy fee imposed pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2003, c.114 (C.54:32D-1), or the portion of the fee imposed pursuant to section 3 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-7) derived from the sale of real property at the site of the redevelopment project and paid to the State Treasurer for use by the State, that is not credited to the "Shore Protection Fund" or the "Neighborhood Preservation Nonlapsing Revolving Fund" ("New Jersey Affordable Housing Trust Fund") pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1968, c.49 (C.46:15-8).  Any developer shall be allowed to assign their ability to apply for the tax credit under this subsection to a non-profit organization with a mission dedicated to attracting investment and completing development and redevelopment projects in a Garden State Growth Zone.  The non-profit organization may make an application on behalf of a developer which meets the requirements for the tax credit, or a group of non-qualifying developers, such that these will be considered a unified project for the purposes of the incentives provided under this section. b.    (1)  (a)  Up to an average of 75 percent of the projected annual incremental revenues or 85 percent of the projected annual incremental revenues in a Garden State Growth Zone may be pledged towards the State portion of an incentive grant. (b)   State incentive grants not to exceed an aggregate total value of $75,000,000 shall be made available by the authority for applications submitted after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156, but prior to December 31, 2021, for projects that are predominantly commercial and contain 100,000 or more square feet of office and retail space, or industrial space for purchase or lease, and may include a parking component.  The developer of a project seeking an award of credits for a project restricted under this subparagraph shall submit an incentive grant application prior to December 31, 2021, and if approved after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156, shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for the project no later than December 31, 2024.  In addition to the requirements for an incentive award set forth in P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489a et al.), a developer shall be eligible to receive an award of credits for a project restricted under this subparagraph only if the developer demonstrates to the authority at that time of application that: (i) the project shall comply with minimum environmental and sustainability standards; (ii) the project shall comply with the authority's affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); (iii) each worker employed by the developer, or subcontractor of a developer working at the project, shall be paid not less than $15 per hour or 120 percent of the minimum wage fixed under subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4), whichever is higher; and (iv) during the eligibility period, each worker employed to perform construction work or building services work at the project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.). (2)   In the case of a qualified residential project or a project involving university infrastructure, if the authority determines that the estimated amount of incremental revenues pledged towards the State portion of an incentive grant is inadequate to fully fund the amount of the State portion of the incentive grant, then in lieu of an incentive grant based on the incremental revenues, the developer shall be awarded tax credits equal to the full amount of the incentive grant. (3)   In the case of a mixed use parking project, if the authority determines that the estimated amount of incremental revenues pledged towards the State portion of an incentive grant is inadequate to fully fund the amount of the State portion of the incentive grant, then, in lieu of an incentive grant based on the incremental revenues, the developer shall be awarded tax credits equal to the full amount of the incentive grant. The value of all credits approved by the authority pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection shall not exceed $993,000,000, of which: (a)   $250,000,000 shall be restricted to qualified residential projects within Atlantic, Burlington, Camden, Cape May, Cumberland, Gloucester, Ocean, and Salem counties, of which $175,000,000 of the credits shall be restricted to the following categories of projects: (i) qualified residential projects located in a Garden State Growth Zone located within the aforementioned counties; and (ii) mixed use parking projects located in a Garden State Growth Zone or urban transit hub located within the aforementioned counties; (iii) and $75,000,000 of the credits shall be restricted to qualified residential projects in municipalities with a 2007 Municipal Revitalization Index of 400 or higher as of the date of enactment of the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.) and located within the aforementioned counties; (b)   $440,000,000 shall be restricted to the following categories of projects: (i) qualified residential projects located in urban transit hubs that are commuter rail in nature that otherwise do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (ii) qualified residential projects located in Garden State Growth Zones that do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (iii) mixed use parking projects located in urban transit hubs or Garden State Growth Zones that do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, provided however, an urban transit hub shall be allocated no more than $25,000,000 for mixed use parking projects; (iv) qualified residential projects which are disaster recovery projects that otherwise do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (v) qualified residential projects in SDA municipalities located in Hudson County that were awarded State Aid in State Fiscal Year 2013 through the Transitional Aid to Localities program and otherwise do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (vi) $25,000,000 of credits shall be restricted to mixed use parking projects in Garden State Growth Zones which have a population in excess of 125,000 and do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (vii) $40,000,000 of credits shall be restricted to qualified residential projects that include a theater venue for the performing arts and do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, which projects are located in a municipality with a population of less than 100,000 according to the latest federal decennial census, and within which municipality is located an urban transit hub and a campus of a public research university, as defined in section 1 of P.L.2009, c.308 (C.18A:3B-46); and (viii) $150,000,000 of credits shall be restricted to qualified residential projects and mixed use parking projects in Garden State Growth Zones having a population in excess of 125,000 and do not qualify under subparagraph (a) of this paragraph; (c)   $87,000,000 shall be restricted to the following categories of projects: (i) qualified residential projects located in distressed municipalities, deep poverty pockets, highlands development credit receiving areas or redevelopment areas, otherwise not qualifying pursuant to subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph; and (ii) mixed use parking projects that do not qualify under subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, and which are used by an independent institution of higher education, a school of medicine, a nonprofit hospital system, or any combination thereof; provided, however, that $20,000,000 of the $87,000,000 shall be allocated to mixed use parking projects that do not qualify under subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph; (d)   (i) $16,000,000 shall be restricted to qualified residential projects that are located within a qualifying economic redevelopment and growth grant incentive area otherwise not qualifying under subparagraph (a), (b), or (c) of this paragraph; and (ii)   an additional $50,000,000 shall be restricted to qualified residential projects which, as of the effective date of P.L.2016, c.51, are located in a city of the first class with a population in excess of 270,000, are subject to a Renewal Contract for a Section 8 Mark-Up-To-Market Project from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, and for which an application for the award of tax credits under this subsection was submitted prior to January 1, 2016; (e)   $25,000,000 shall be restricted to projects involving university infrastructure; and (f)   (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2021, c.160) (g)   $125,000,000 shall be restricted to applications submitted after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.) for residential projects in any county of the State. (h)   For subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this paragraph, not more than $40,000,000 of credits shall be awarded to any qualified residential project in a deep poverty pocket or distressed municipality and not more than $20,000,000 of credits shall be awarded to any other qualified residential project.  The developer of a qualified residential project seeking an award of credits towards the funding of its incentive grant shall submit an incentive grant application prior to July 1, 2016 and if approved after September 18, 2013, the effective date of P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.) shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for the project no later than December 31, 2023.  The developer of a mixed use parking project seeking an award of credits towards the funding of its incentive grant pursuant to subparagraph (c) of this paragraph and if approved after the effective date of P.L.2015, c.217, shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for the project no later than December 31, 2023.  The developer of a qualified residential project or a mixed use parking project seeking an award of credits toward the funding of its incentive grant for a project restricted under categories (vi) and (viii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph shall submit an incentive grant application prior to July 1, 2019 or, in the case of a project restricted under category (viii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, December 31, 2021, and if approved after the effective date of P.L.2017, c.59, shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for the project no later than June 30, [2026] 2028 provided that the municipality in which the project is located shall have submitted to the chief executive officer of the authority a letter of support identifying up to six projects prior to July 1, 2018.  The letter of support is to contain a project scope for each of the projects and may be supplemented or amended from time to time until July 1, 2019 or, in the case of a project restricted under categories (vi) and (viii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph, December 31, 2022.  A developer may amend the application, or assign the application to a municipal 1[developer] redeveloper1 , for a project restricted under categories (vi) and (viii) of subparagraph (b) of this paragraph that is described in subparagraph (c) of paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1) by excluding the visitor center, youth center, or both from the application, provided that the project otherwise qualifies as a mixed use parking project, and, notwithstanding any provisions of section 3 of P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1) or any law or rule to the contrary, the maximum amount of any redevelopment incentive grant for the modified project shall be as set forth for projects described in subparagraph (c) of paragraph (2) of subsection b. of section 3 of P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1).  Applications for tax credits pursuant to this subsection relating to an ancillary infrastructure project or infrastructure improvement in the public right-of-way, or both, shall be accompanied with a letter of support relating to the project or improvement by the governing body or agency in which the project is located.  Credits awarded to a developer pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to the same financial and related analysis by the authority, the same term of the grant, and the same mechanism for administering the credits, and shall be utilized or transferred by the developer as if the credits had been awarded to the developer pursuant to section 35 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.34:1B-209.3) for qualified residential projects thereunder.  No portion of the revenues pledged pursuant to the "New Jersey Economic Opportunity Act of 2013," P.L.2013, c.161 (C.52:27D-489p et al.) shall be subject to withholding or retainage for adjustment, in the event the developer or taxpayer waives its rights to claim a refund thereof. (i)    The developer of a project seeking an award of credits for a project restricted under subparagraph (g) of this paragraph shall submit an incentive grant application prior to December 31, 2021, and if approved after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.156 (C.34:1B-269 et al.), shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for the project no later than December 31, 2024.  In addition to the requirements for an award of credits set forth in P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489a et al.), a developer shall be eligible to receive an award of credits for a project restricted under subparagraph (g) of this paragraph only if the developer demonstrates to the authority at that time of application that: (i) the project shall comply with minimum environmental and sustainability standards; (ii) the project shall comply with the authority's affirmative action requirements, adopted pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1979, c.303 (C.34:1B-5.4); (iii) each worker employed by the developer or subcontractor of a developer working at the project shall be paid not less than $15 per hour or 120 percent of the minimum wage fixed under subsection a. of section 5 of P.L.1966, c.113 (C.34:11-56a4), whichever is higher; and (iv) during the eligibility period, each worker employed to perform construction work or building services work at the project shall be paid not less than the prevailing wage rate for the worker's craft or trade, as determined by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development pursuant to P.L.1963, c.150 (C.34:11-56.25 et seq.) and P.L.2005, c.379 (C.34:11-56.58 et seq.). Prior to the board considering an application submitted by a developer for a project restricted under subparagraph (g) of this paragraph, the authority shall confirm with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, the Department of Environmental Protection, and the Department of the Treasury whether the developer is in substantial good standing with the respective department, or has entered into an agreement with the respective department that includes a practical corrective action plan for the developer.  The developer, or an authorized agent of the developer, shall certify to the authority that all factual assertions made in the developer's application are true under the penalty of perjury.  If at any time the authority determines that the developer made a material misrepresentation on the developer's application, the developer shall forfeit the award of credits and the authority shall recapture any tax credits awarded to the developer. (4)   A developer may apply to the Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury and the chief executive officer of the authority for a tax credit transfer certificate, if the developer is awarded a tax credit pursuant to paragraph (2) or paragraph (3) of this subsection, covering one or more years, in lieu of the developer being allowed any amount of the credit against the tax liability of the developer.  The tax credit transfer certificate, upon receipt thereof by the developer from the director and the chief executive officer of the authority, may be sold or assigned, in full or in part, to any other person who may have a tax liability pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1945, c.162 (C.54:10A-5), sections 2 and 3 of P.L.1945, c.132 (C.54:18A-2 and C.54:18A-3), section 1 of P.L.1950, c.231 (C.17:32-15), or N.J.S.17B:23-5.  The certificate provided to the developer shall include a statement waiving the developer's right to claim that amount of the credit against the taxes that the developer has elected to sell or assign.  The sale or assignment of any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate allowed under this paragraph shall not be exchanged for consideration received by the developer of less than 75 percent of the transferred credit amount before considering any further discounting to present value that may be permitted.  Any amount of a tax credit transfer certificate used by a purchaser or assignee against a tax liability shall be subject to the same limitations and conditions that apply to the use of the credit by the developer who originally applied for and was allowed the credit. c.     All administrative costs associated with the incentive grant shall be assessed to the applicant and be retained by the State Treasurer from the annual incentive grant payments. d.    The incremental revenue for the revenues listed in subsection a. of this section shall be calculated as the difference between the amount collected in any fiscal year from any eligible revenue source included in the State redevelopment incentive grant agreement, less the revenue increment base for that eligible revenue. e.     The municipality is authorized to collect any information necessary to facilitate grants under this program and remit that information in order to assist in the calculation of incremental revenue. (cf: P.L.2022, c.75, s.2) 3.    Section 3 of P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1) is amended to read as follows: 3.    Notwithstanding any provision of the "New Jersey Economic Stimulus Act of 2009," P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489a et al.) to the contrary, the following provisions shall apply to a mixed use parking project that is restricted under categories (vi) or (viii) of subparagraph (b) of paragraph (3) of subsection b. of section 6 of P.L.2009, c.90 (C.52:27D-489f) and undertaken by a municipal redeveloper after the effective date of P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1 et al.), for which a redevelopment incentive grant is awarded: a.     A municipal redeveloper shall submit a temporary certificate of occupancy for such proposed mixed use parking project no later than June 30, [2026] 2028. b.    (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a redevelopment incentive grant award shall be equal to 100 percent of the total project costs allocated to the parking component of the project and 40 percent of the total project costs allocated to the non-parking component of a proposed mixed use parking project. (2)   A redevelopment incentive grant award shall be equal to 100 percent of the total project costs allocated to the parking component of the project and 80 percent of the total project costs allocated to the non-parking component of the mixed use parking project if the mixed use parking project is: (a)   constructed upon all or a portion of a project site that was previously the subject of an award of tax credits pursuant to the "Urban Transit Hub Tax Credit Act," P.L.2007, c. 346 (C.34:1B-207 et seq.) or the "New Jersey Economic Stimulus Act of 2009," P.L.2009, c. 90 (C.52:27D-489a et al.), but the tax credits were not issued; (b)   an entertainment venue with seating capacity in excess of 5,000; or (c)   constructed to be utilized by a visitor center or youth center within or adjacent to a national historic park. c.     The terms of any approval, granted by the authority, for a proposed mixed use parking project undertaken by a municipal redeveloper, which has not yet commenced construction activities other than demolition or site work, may be modified to reflect the terms established pursuant to P.L.2022, c.75 (C.52:27D-489i1 et al.), upon application to the authority for review and approval; provided, however, the developer shall not be required to pay any fee that may be established under law or regulation related to the application for modification.  All dates of required action by a municipal redeveloper contained in an approval, granted by the authority, shall be automatically extended by the thirty-month period corresponding to the temporary certificate of occupancy submission date established by subsection a. of this section. d.    All proposed mixed use parking projects shall comply with Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) standards, to the extent that the United States Green Building Council shall have promulgated standards for the project type proposed. (cf: P.L.2022, c.75, s.3) 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.